Massachusetts, session 194th, H5344.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding anything in chapter 128 of the acts of 1997 to the contrary,
restaurants holding licenses issued pursuant to such chapter, or authorized pursuant to a ballot
question thereunder, may have any number of seats.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding anything in chapter 14 of the acts of 2004 to the contrary,
restaurants holding licenses issued pursuant to such chapter, or authorized pursuant to a ballot
question thereunder, may have any number of seats.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of chapter 388 of the acts of 2010 is hereby amended by striking
out the words "having a seating capacity of not less than 60 and no more than 250 seats".
SECTION 4. Section 1 of chapter 15 of the acts of 2014 is hereby amended by striking
out the words "having a seating capacity of not less than 39 and not more than 125 seats".
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1